Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1616
Cashier's bonds; amount.

In all counties in the State of Nebraska having a population of two hundred thousand or more, where clerks are employed as cashiers and as such handle public funds, said clerks shall give bond in like manner as provided for county treasurers and deputy county treasurers in said counties. The bonds shall be in such sum as the county boards of said counties may determine, and the premium of the bonds shall be paid for as is now provided for said county treasurers and deputy county treasurers.

Laws 1931, c. 37, § 1, p. 130;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-1317;

R.S.1943, § 23-1616.

Elected county officials are required to give individual official bonds. Blanket bond is not sufficient. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).